Oklahoma, session 2025, SB502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 761 of Title 21, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. “Cannibalism” means to willingly ingest the flesh, blood, or


tissue of a human being.


B. It shall be unlawful for any person to commit cannibalism.


Any person who violates the provision of this section shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not to exceed


fourteen (14) years.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1571 CN 1/19/2025 5:37:39 AM

Req. No. 1571 Page 1